Indiana, session 2026, HB1304.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 9-13-2-53 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 53. "Fair market value",
for purposes of IC 9-17-9 and IC 9-22-3, has the meaning set forth in
IC 9-22-3-2.
SECTION 2. IC 9-17-1-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.164-2020,
SECTION 36, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) This article does not apply to the following:
(1) A vehicle that is not required to be registered under IC 9-18-2
(before its expiration) or IC 9-18.1.
(2) Special machinery.
(3) A motor vehicle that was designed to have a maximum design
speed of not more than twenty-five (25) miles per hour and that
was built, constructed, modified, or assembled by a person other
than the manufacturer.
(4) Motor driven cycles.
(5) An off-road vehicle that was purchased or otherwise acquired
before January 1, 2010.
2026 IN 1304—LS 7008/DI 151


(6) Snowmobiles.
(7) A watercraft that is not required to be registered under
IC 9-31-3 (before its repeal) or IC 9-18.1-14.5.
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), a person may apply for:
(1) a certificate of title under IC 9-17-2-2; or
(2) a bonded certificate of title under IC 9-17-9; or
(2) (3) a special identification number under IC 9-17-4;
for a vehicle listed in subsection (a).
(c) If the bureau issues a certificate of title under subsection (b)(1),
the vehicle remains subject to this article until the titleholder
surrenders the title to the bureau.
SECTION 3. IC 9-17-9 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 9. Bonded Certificates of Title
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "fair market value" has the
meaning set forth in IC 9-22-3-2.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "vintage motor vehicle" means
a motor vehicle that:
(1) is at least twenty-five (25) years old;
(2) has a fair market value of not more than twenty thousand
dollars ($20,000); and
(3) does not have a current certificate of title.
Sec. 3. A person may apply for a bonded certificate of title for
a vintage motor vehicle if the vehicle is not:
(1) a salvage vehicle; or
(2) encumbered by any liens or mortgages.
Sec. 4. A person applying for a bonded certificate of title for a
vintage motor vehicle must:
(1) purchase a title bond for:
(A) one and one-half (1 1/2) times the fair market value of
the vehicle, if the vehicle has a vehicle identification
number; or
(B) two (2) times the fair market value of the vehicle, if the
vehicle has a special identification number; and
(2) submit an application in the form and manner prescribed
by the bureau and provide the following information:
(A) A full description of the vehicle, including the make,
model, and year of manufacture of the vehicle.
(B) The vehicle identification number or special
identification number of the vehicle.
(C) The purchase or acquisition date.
2026 IN 1304—LS 7008/DI 151


(D) A valid bill of sale or an affidavit of ownership. If an
affidavit of ownership is provided, it must be on the
bureau's designated form.
(E) The name and Social Security number or federal
identification number of the person.
(F) Proof of notice required under section 8 of this chapter,
if applicable.
(G) Any other information that the bureau requires.
Sec. 5. (a) The application described in section 4 of this chapter
must include the following printed statement:
"I swear or affirm that the information I have entered on this
form is correct. I understand that making a false statement on
this form may constitute the crime of perjury.".
(b) The person applying for the bonded certificate of title must
sign the form directly below the printed statement.
Sec. 6. (a) An application for a bonded certificate of title for a
vintage motor vehicle must contain the odometer reading of the
vintage motor vehicle in miles or kilometers as of the date of sale
or transfer of the vintage motor vehicle to the applicant.
(b) A person shall not knowingly furnish to the bureau odometer
information that does not accurately indicate the total recorded
miles or kilometers on the vintage motor vehicle.
(c) The bureau and its license branches are not subject to a
criminal or civil action by a person for an invalid odometer
reading on a bonded certificate of title.
Sec. 7. (a) Subject to subsection (c), an application for a bonded
certificate of title for a vintage motor vehicle may not be accepted
by the bureau unless the vintage motor vehicle has been inspected
by one (1) of the following:
(1) An employee of a dealer licensed under IC 9-32.
(2) A military police officer assigned to a military post in
Indiana.
(3) A police officer.
(4) A designated employee of the bureau.
(5) An employee of a qualified person operating under a
contract with the commission.
(6) An employee of a dealer that is:
(A) licensed as a motor vehicle dealer in a state other than
Indiana; and
(B) approved by the bureau.
(b) A person described in subsection (a) inspecting a vintage
motor vehicle shall do the following:
2026 IN 1304—LS 7008/DI 151


(1) Make a record of inspection upon the application form
prepared by the bureau.
(2) Verify the facts set out in the application.
(c) The bureau may accept an inspection performed by a police
officer from a jurisdiction outside Indiana if the bureau determines
that an inspection performed by an individual described in
subsection (a) is unavailable or otherwise insufficient to complete
an application for a bonded certificate of title.
(d) A police officer who makes an inspection under this section
may charge a fee, subject to the following:
(1) The fee must be established by an ordinance adopted by
the unit (as defined in IC 36-1-2-23) that employs the police
officer.
(2) The fee may not exceed five dollars ($5).
(3) The revenue from the fee shall be deposited in the
following manner:
(A) In a special vehicle inspection fund if the police officer
making the inspection is a member of the county sheriff's
department. The fiscal body of the unit must appropriate
the money from the inspection fund only for law
enforcement purposes.
(B) In a local law enforcement continuing education fund
established by IC 5-2-8-2 if the police officer making the
inspection is a member of a city or town police department,
a town marshal, a town marshal deputy, a conservancy
district marshal, or a deputy conservancy district marshal.
Sec. 8. (a) Before issuing a bonded certificate of title, the bureau
shall conduct a search of the National Motor Vehicle Title
Information System or an equivalent and commonly available data
base to attempt to obtain the last state of record of the vintage
motor vehicle in order to attempt to ascertain the name and
address of the person who owns or holds a lien on the vintage
motor vehicle.
(b) If the bureau obtains the name and address of the owner or
lienholder on the vintage motor vehicle, the applicant shall, not
later than three (3) business days after obtaining the name and
address, notify the owner of and any lienholder on the vintage
motor vehicle, as indicated by the certificate of title or discovered
by a search under subsection (a), of the following:
(1) The name, address, and telephone number of the
applicant.
(2) That the owner or lienholder has thirty (30) days after
2026 IN 1304—LS 7008/DI 151


receiving the notice to respond.
(3) That the applicant will be permitted to apply for a bonded
certificate of title if the owner or lienholder does not respond
within thirty (30) days.
The notice must be made by certified mail.
Sec. 9. (a) The bureau may:
(1) make investigations or require additional information; and
(2) reject an application or request;
if the bureau is not satisfied of the genuineness, regularity, or
legality of an application or the truth of a statement in an
application, or for any other reason.
(b) If the bureau is satisfied that the person applying for a
bonded certificate of title for a vintage motor vehicle:
(1) is the owner of the vintage motor vehicle; and
(2) has purchased a title bond in the amount described in
section 4 of this chapter;
the bureau shall issue a bonded certificate of title for the vintage
motor vehicle after the person pays the applicable fee under
subsection (c).
(c) The fee for a bonded certificate of title for a vintage motor
vehicle is fifteen dollars ($15). The fee shall be distributed as
follows:
(1) Fifty cents ($0.50) to the state motor vehicle technology
fund.
(2) To the motor vehicle highway account as follows:
(A) For a title issued before January 1, 2027, one dollar
($1).
(B) For a title issued after December 31, 2026, three dollars
and twenty-five cents ($3.25).
(3) For a title issued before January 1, 2027, three dollars ($3)
to the highway, road and street fund.
(4) Five dollars ($5) to the crossroads 2000 fund.
(5) One dollar and twenty-five cents ($1.25) to the integrated
public safety communications fund.
(6) To the commission fund as follows:
(A) For a title issued before January 1, 2027, four dollars
and twenty-five cents ($4.25).
(B) For a title issued after December 31, 2026, five dollars
($5).
(d) The bureau shall deliver a bonded certificate of title to the
person that owns the vintage motor vehicle for which the bonded
certificate of title was issued.
2026 IN 1304—LS 7008/DI 151


Sec. 10. (a) A bonded certificate of title is valid for:
(1) three (3) years for a vintage motor vehicle that has a
vehicle identification number; or
(2) five (5) years for a vintage motor vehicle that has a special
identification number.
(b) If there are no claims made against the bonded title within
the time frames described in subsection (a), the bonded certificate
of title becomes a certificate of title under IC 9-17-2.
Sec. 11. (a) A person who knowingly or intentionally provides
false information to receive a bonded certificate of title commits
fraud involving a bonded certificate of title, a Level 6 felony.
(b) In addition to the penalties described in IC 35-50-2-7(b), a
person who is convicted of a Level 6 felony under this section shall
have the person's bonded certificate of title invalidated.
Sec. 12. The bureau shall allow the:
(1) application for; and
(2) processing of:
bonded certificates of title to occur at license branches.
SECTION 4. IC 34-30-2.1-90.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 90.3. IC 9-17-9-6 (Concerning the
bureau of motor vehicles and license branches for invalid odometer
readings on bonded certificates of title).
SECTION 5. IC 35-52-9.1-2.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2.6. IC 9-17-9-11 defines a crime
concerning bonded certificates of title.
SECTION 6. [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026] (a) Not later than June
30, 2027, the bureau of motor vehicles shall amend 140 IAC 6-1-2
to increase the vehicle value from five thousand dollars ($5,000) to
twenty thousand dollars ($20,000).
(b) This SECTION expires July 1, 2027.
2026 IN 1304—LS 7008/DI 151